Washington statutes.
RCW 17.24.061

Protection of privileged or confidential information—Procedure—Notice—Declaratory judgment.

(1) In submitting data required by this chapter, the applicant may: (a) Mark clearly portions of data which in his or her opinion are trade secrets or commercial or financial information; and (b) submit the marked material separately from other material required to be submitted under this chapter.

(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter or other law, the director shall not make information submitted by an applicant or registrant under this chapter available to the public if, in the judgment of the director, the information is privileged or confidential because it contains or relates to trade secrets or commercial or financial information. Where necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter, information relating to unpublished formulas of products acquired by authorization of this chapter may be revealed to any state or federal agency consulted and may be revealed at a public hearing or in findings of fact issued by the director.

(3) If the director proposes to release for inspection or to reveal at a public hearing or in findings of fact issued by the director, information that the applicant or registrant believes to be protected from disclosure under subsection (2) of this section, he or she shall notify the applicant or registrant in writing, by certified mail. The director may not make this data available for inspection nor reveal the information at a public hearing or in findings of fact issued by the director until thirty days after receipt of the notice by the applicant or registrant. During this period, the applicant or registrant may withdraw the application or may institute an action in the superior court of Thurston county for a declaratory judgment as to whether the information is subject to protection under subsection (2) of this section.

[ 1991 c 257 s 10.]